Arkansas, session 2025, SB220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "Invest Arkansas Exemption Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-42-504(a)(12), concerning an exempt
transaction that is an offer or sale of a security by an issuer under the
Arkansas Securities Act, is amended to read as follows:
(12) An offer or sale of a security by an issuer if the offer or
sale of the security is conducted according to the following:
(A) Either of the following applies:
(i) The issuer of the security is a corporation or
other business entity organized and operating for-profit business entity
formed under the laws of this state and has its principal place of business
in Arkansas and is registered with the Secretary of State;
(B) the The transaction meets the requirements of the
federal exemption for intrastate offerings in either:
(i) section Section 3(a)(11) of the Securities Act
*ANS121*
02/12/2025 2:39:07 PM ANS121

SB220
of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77c(a)(11), as it existed on January 1, 2017 January 1,
2025, and Rule 147 of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission,
17 C.F.R. § 230.147, as it existed on January 1, 2017, and as such, the
securities shall be offered to and sold only to persons who are residents of
this state at the time of purchase January 1, 2025; or
(ii) The issuer of the security is a corporation or
other business entity with its principal place of business in Arkansas and
the transaction meets the requirements of the federal exemption for
intrastate offerings in section 28 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1933, 15
U.S.C. § 77z-3, as it existed on January 1, 2017, and Rule 147A of the United
States Securities and Exchange Commission, 17 C.F.R. § 230.147A, as it
existed on January 1, 2017, and as such, the securities shall be sold only to
persons who are residents of this state at the time of purchase January 1,
2025;
(B)(C) The sum of all cash and other consideration to be
received for all sales of the security in reliance upon the exemption
described in this subdivision (a)(12) shall not exceed one million dollars
($1,000,000) ten million dollars ($10,000,000), less the aggregate amount
received for all sales of securities by the issuer within six (6) months
after the completion of the offering twelve (12) months before the first
offer or sale made in reliance upon this exemption;
(C)(D)(i) The issuer shall not accept more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from any
single purchaser unless the purchaser is an accredited investor as defined by
Rule 501 of United States Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation D, 17
C.F.R. § 230.501, as it existed on January 1, 2017 January 1, 2025.
(ii) Two (2) or more individual purchasers residing
at the same primary residence who are not accredited investors and have a
close family relationship shall be treated as a single purchaser for purposes
of the monetary limit under subdivision (a)(12)(D)(i) of this section;
(D) The issuer should reasonably believe that all
purchasers of securities are purchasing for investment and not for sale in
connection with a distribution of the security;
(E) A commission or remuneration shall not be paid or
given, directly or indirectly, for a person's participation in the offer or
sale of securities for the issuer unless the person is registered as a
02/12/2025 2:39:07 PM ANS121

SB220
broker-dealer or agent under this chapter All funds received from investors
shall:
(i) Be deposited into a bank as defined in § 23-45-
102(a)(5)(A) authorized to do business in this state; and
(ii) Used according to the representations made to
investors;
(F)(i) The commissioner may by rule or order, as to any
security or transaction or any type of security or transaction, withdraw or
further condition the exemption under this subdivision (a)(12) The issuer
shall file a proof of exemption with the commissioner in writing at least ten
(10) days before securities are sold.
(ii) The proof of exemption under subdivision
(a)(12)(F)(i) of this section shall specify that the issuer is conducting an
offering in reliance of the exemption under this subdivision (a)(12).
(iii) The proof of exemption under subdivision
(a)(12)(F)(i) of this section shall contain:
(a) The name and address of the issuer;
(b) The name and address of all persons who
will be involved in the offer or sale of securities on behalf of the issuer;
(c) The name and address of the bank as
defined in § 23-45-102(a)(5)(A) into which investor funds will be deposited;
and
(d) A copy of the offering documents to be
provided to each prospective purchaser in connection with the offering.
(G)(iv) A The issuer shall pay a filing fee of one
hundred dollars ($100) shall be paid to the commissioner for every proof of
exemption filed with the commissioner under this subdivision (a)(12)
(a)(12)(F)(i) of this section;.
(v) If the information contained in the proof of
exemption filed with the commissioner under subdivision (a)(12)(F)(i) of this
section becomes inaccurate for any reason, the issuer shall file an amendment
in writing with the commissioner within sixty (60) days;
(G) The issuer shall inform all purchasers that the
securities have not been registered under this chapter and cannot be resold
unless the securities are:
(i) Registered or qualify for an exemption from
02/12/2025 2:39:07 PM ANS121

SB220
registration under this section and §§ 23-42-501 — 503; and
(ii) Subject to the limitation on resales contained
in either:
(a) Subsection (e) of Rule 147 of the United
States Securities and Exchange Commission, 17 C.F.R. 230.147(e), as it
existed on January 1, 2025, and in the manner described in subsection (f) of
Rule 147 of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, 17 C.F.R.
230.147(f), as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(b) Subsection (e) of Rule 147(A) of the
United States Securities and Exchange Commission, 17 C.F.R. 230.147A(e), as
it existed on January 1, 2025, and in the manner described in subsection (f)
of Rule 147A of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, 17
C.F.R. 230.147(A)(f), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(H) A commission or other remuneration shall not be paid
or given, directly or indirectly, for any person’s participation in the offer
or sale of securities for the issuer unless the person is registered as a
broker-dealer or agent under this chapter or a funding portal registered with
the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority;
(I) The issuer shall not be, either before or as a result
of the offering:
(i) An investment company as defined in Section 3 of
the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-3, as it existed on
January 1, 2025;
(ii) Subject to the reporting requirements of:
(a) Section 13 of the Securities and Exchange
Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78m, as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(b) Section 15(d) of the Securities and
Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78o(d), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
or
(iii) Considered a blind pool or a company that has:
(a) Not yet defined its business operations;
(b) No business plan;
(c) No stated investment goal for the funds
being raised; or
(d) Plans to engage in a merger or acquisition
with an unspecified business entity;
02/12/2025 2:39:07 PM ANS121

SB220
(J) The exemption under this subdivision (a)(12) shall not
be used in conjunction with any other exemption under this chapter except
for:
(i) The exemption to institutional investors under
subdivision (a)(8) of this section; and
(ii)(a) Offers and sales to controlling persons of
the issuer.
(b) Sales to controlling persons under
subdivision (a)(12)(J)(ii)(a) of this section shall not count toward the
limitation under subdivision (a)(12)(D) of this section; and
(K) The exemption under this subdivision (a)(12) shall
not:
(i) Be available if the issuer is subject to an
event that would disqualify an issuer under Rule 506(d)(1) of the United
States Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation D, 17 C.F.R. §
230.506(d)(1), as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(ii) Be construed to alleviate a person from the
antifraud provisions under § 23-42-507.


















02/12/2025 2:39:07 PM ANS121